Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2911
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act. The rules and regulations may include procedures under which the department, upon receiving a request for personal information that is not subject to disclosure in accordance with the exception provisions of sections 60-2906 and 60-2907, may mail a copy of such request to each individual who is the subject of the information, informing each such individual of the request, together with a statement to the effect that disclosure is prohibited and will not be made unless the individual affirmatively elects to waive his or her right to privacy under the act.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 11.